Wyoming, session 2025, SF0198.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 146,
Section 3(b) is amended to read:

(b) The amounts appropriated under subsection (a) of
this section to the state shooting complex account shall
only be expended through additional action of the
legislature by the department of state parks and cultural
resources for the siting and construction of the Wyoming
state shooting complex. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose. Any
SF0198

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0802
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining in the account
shall revert to the accounts from which they were
appropriated, unless otherwise provided, on June 30, 2026.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0198